District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0477.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Portable Tenant Screening Report Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 510 of the District of Columbia Rental Housing Act of 1985, effective 28
July 17, 1985, (D.C. Law 6-10; D.C. Official Code §42-3505.10), is amended to read as follows:
(a) A new subsection (b-5) is added to read as follows:
“(b-5) Reusable Tenant Screening Reports.
“(1) A housing provider shall accept a reusable tenant screening report from a
prospective tenant in lieu of requiring a tenant pay an application fee to conduct a new tenant


screening, provided that:
“(A) The reusable tenant screening report was completed within the
previous 30 days by a credit or consumer reporting agency;
“(B) The reusable tenant screening report includes, at a minimum:
“(i) The prospective tenant’s name and contact information;
“(ii) A credit report;
“(iii) Current address and rental history; and
“(iv) Results of an eviction-history check for all jurisdictions in
which the prospective tenant has resided, subject to the limitations set forth in subsection (d) of
this section.
“(C) The reusable tenant screening report is made available to the housing
provider at no cost to access or use; and
“(D) The prospective tenant certifies that there has been no material
change to the information contained in the reusable tenant screening report since its preparation,
including names, addresses, credit reporting, or eviction history.
“(2) A housing provider that receives a reusable tenant screening report pursuant
to this subsection shall not:
“(A) Charge a prospective tenant any fee to access or use the reusable
tenant screening report; or
“(B) Charge a prospective tenant an application fee under subsection
(b)(1) of this section for the purpose of conducting a new tenant screening.
“(3) Before collecting any application fee or conducting a tenant screening, a
housing provider shall notify a prospective tenant in writing of:


“(A) The tenant’s right to provide a reusable tenant screening report under
this subsection;
“(B) The housing provider’s obligation not to charge the application fee
describe in subsection (b)(1) if the tenant provides a reusable tenant screening report; and
“(C) The housing provider’s obligation, upon completion of any tenant
screening, to provide the prospective tenant with a copy of the screening report used, including
the date it was furnished, so that the prospective tenant may use the report as a reusable tenant
screening report for other housing applications.
“(4) A housing provider may deny a tenancy application or require a prospective
tenant to pay an application fee for a new screening if the prospective tenant knowingly provides
materially altered or falsified information on their reusable tenant screening report.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.